Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-3] Elections
covered. The voting procedures in this chapter apply to:

(1) A general, special, or primary election for federal office;

(2) A general, special, or primary election for
statewide or state legislative office or state ballot measure; and

(3) A general, special, recall, primary, or runoff
election for local government office or local ballot measure conducted under
section 11-91.5 for which absentee voting or voting by mail is available for
other voters. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next